Missouri, session 2026, HB1997.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 21, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 21.158, to read as follows:
21.158. The general assembly, the house, or the senate may employ legislative
security officers of the house or senate who may carry firearms when necessary for the
proper discharge of their duties. Such legislative security officers, who shall be licensed
peace officers under the peace officer standards and training program (POST), shall
have all powers granted to law enforcement officers in this state that are necessary to
ensure the proper security and functioning of the general assembly, including the power
to apprehend and arrest persons.
Section B. Because immediate action is necessary to ensure safety within the capitol
building during the current legislative session and thereafter, section A of this act is deemed
necessary for the immediate preservation of the public health, welfare, peace, and safety, and
is hereby declared to be an emergency act within the meaning of the constitution, and section
A of this act shall be in full force and effect upon its passage and approval.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.